Nevada, session 83, SB251.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 641.0263 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641.0263 “Psychological assistant” means a person [registered
with the Board] holding a provisional license as a psychological
assistant issued by the Board pursuant to [subsection 1 of NRS
641.226.] NRS 641.110.
Sec. 2. NRS 641.0265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.0265 “Psychological intern” means a person [registered
with the Board] holding a provisional license as a psychological
intern issued by the Board pursuant to [subsection 2 of NRS
641.226.] NRS 641.110.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 4. NRS 641.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.090 1. The Secretary-Treasurer shall make and keep on
behalf of the Board:
(a) A record of all its meetings and proceedings.
(b) A record of all violations and prosecutions under the
provisions of this chapter.
(c) A record of all examinations of applicants.
(d) A register of all licenses , registrations and [registrations.]
provisional licenses.
(e) A register of all holders of licenses , registrations and
[registrations.] provisional licenses.
(f) An inventory of the property of the Board and of the State in
the Board’s possession.
2. These records must be kept in the office of the Board and,
except as otherwise provided in this section, are subject to public
inspection during normal working hours upon reasonable notice.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the Board
may keep the personnel records of applicants confidential.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Board, all documents and other
information filed with the complaint and all documents and other
information compiled as a result of an investigation conducted to
determine whether to initiate disciplinary action against a person are
confidential, unless the person submits a written statement to the
Board requesting that such documents and information be made
public records.
5. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all other
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
6. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the Board from
communicating or cooperating with or providing any documents or
other information to any other licensing board or any other agency
that is investigating a person, including, without limitation, a law
enforcement agency.
Sec. 5. NRS 641.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.100 1. The Board shall adopt regulations:
(a) Prescribing uniform standards concerning the locations at
which persons obtaining supervised experience that is required for
licensure by the Board provide services;
(b) Authorizing the remote supervision, including, without
limitation, electronic supervision, of persons obtaining supervised
experience that is required for licensure by the Board who are
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
working at remote sites and prescribing standards concerning such
remote supervision; and
(c) Prescribing a manner by which the qualifications for the
issuance or renewal of a license under the provisions of this chapter
will be made available to the public such that those qualifications
are clearly defined and easily understood.
2. The Board may make and promulgate any other rules and
regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter
governing its procedure, the examination and licensure of
applicants, the granting, refusal, revocation or suspension of
licenses, the registration of persons as psychological trainees or the
issuance of provisional licenses as psychological assistants [,] or
psychological interns [or psychological trainees] and the practice of
psychology.
3. On the date that the Board gives notice pursuant to NRS
233B.060 of its intent to adopt, amend or repeal a regulation, the
Board shall submit the regulation to the Commission on Behavioral
Health for review. The Commission shall review the regulation and
make recommendations to the Board concerning the advisability of
adopting, amending or repealing the regulation and any changes that
the Commission deems advisable.
Sec. 6. NRS 641.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.110 1. The Board may, under the provisions of this
chapter:
(a) Examine and pass upon the qualifications of the applicants
for licensure.
(b) License qualified applicants.
(c) Register a person as a psychological trainee.
(d) Issue provisional licenses as a psychological assistant [,] or
psychological intern [or psychological trainee .] to qualified
applicants.
[(d)] (e) Revoke or suspend licenses , provisional licenses and
registrations.
[(e)] (f) Collect all fees and make disbursements pursuant to
this chapter.
2. The member of the Board who is a representative of the
general public shall not participate in preparing, conducting or
grading any examination required by the Board.
Sec. 7. NRS 641.1105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.1105 The Board may enter into an agreement with the
Department of Health and Human Services or a division thereof to
provide services to carry out or improve any function of the Board.
Such services may include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
1. Assistance in processing applications for the issuance or
renewal of licenses , registrations and [registrations;] provisional
licenses;
2. Technical assistance;
3. Facilitating cooperation with other boards and licensing
entities in this State or any other jurisdiction;
4. Recommendations to improve and standardize procedures
used by the Board; and
5. Assistance in identifying resources for improving the
operations of the Board.
Sec. 8. NRS 641.117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.117 The Board shall prescribe forms for applying for the
issuance or renewal of a license [.] or provisional license. The
forms must:
1. Be available to be completed on the Internet website
maintained by the Board;
2. Provide immediate, automatic feedback to the applicant
concerning whether the applicant has submitted all required
information; and
3. Automatically store the data submitted by the applicant upon
completion of the application.
Sec. 9. NRS 641.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.145 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the Board
shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and to the Chair of each regional behavioral health
policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a
license , [or] registration or provisional license received by the
Board during the immediately preceding calendar year and the
number of those applications for which the Board conducted
additional review beyond the standard review regularly conducted
by the Board; and
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license by
endorsement received by the Board pursuant to NRS 641.196 during
the immediately preceding calendar year, the number of those
applications that were denied and the reasons for denial.
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair of
each regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429 may be submitted in a written format.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Sec. 10. NRS 641.173 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.173 If the Board requires an applicant for a license , [or]
registration or provisional license pursuant to this chapter to submit
official transcripts as proof of his or her educational qualifications,
the Board must provide an alternate means for the applicant to
submit official transcripts if:
1. The college or university from which the applicant
graduated has closed or has merged with another institution; and
2. The provision of official transcripts by ordinary means is not
available or possible.
Sec. 11. NRS 641.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.175 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter:
(a) An applicant for the issuance of a license , [or] registration
or provisional license shall include the social security number of the
applicant in the application submitted to the Board.
(b) An applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license , [or]
registration or provisional license shall submit to the Board the
statement prescribed by the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant
to NRS 425.520. The statement must be completed and signed by
the applicant.
2. The Board shall include the statement required pursuant to
subsection 1 in:
(a) The application or any other forms that must be submitted
for the issuance or renewal of the license , registration or
[registration;] provisional license; or
(b) A separate form prescribed by the Board.
3. A license , [or] registration or provisional license may not
be issued or renewed by the Board if the applicant:
(a) Fails to submit the statement required pursuant to subsection
1; or
(b) Indicates on the statement submitted pursuant to subsection
1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the support of a
child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan approved by
the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the order for
the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the order.
4. If an applicant indicates on the statement submitted pursuant
to subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the
support of a child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan
approved by the district attorney or other public agency enforcing
the order for the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the
order, the Board shall advise the applicant to contact the district
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
attorney or other public agency enforcing the order to determine the
actions that the applicant may take to satisfy the arrearage.
Sec. 12. NRS 641.2215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.2215 1. The Board shall:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license , [or]
registration or provisional license pursuant to this chapter through a
link on the electronic application for the renewal of a license ,
registration or [registration;] provisional license; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal of
a license , [or] registration or provisional license pursuant to
subsection 1 is confidential and, except as required by subsection 1,
must not be disclosed to any person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license , [or] registration or
provisional license is not required to complete a data request
pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject to disciplinary action,
including, without limitation, refusal to renew the license ,
registration or [registration,] provisional license, for failure to do
so.
Sec. 13. NRS 641.226 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.226 1. A person who wishes to obtain any postdoctoral
supervised experience that is required for licensure as a psychologist
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 641.170 must
[register with] submit an application to the Board for a provisional
license as a psychological assistant.
2. A person who:
(a) Is in a doctoral training program in psychology at an
accredited educational institution approved by the Board or in
doctorate-level training from an accredited educational institution
deemed equivalent by the Board in both subject matter and extent of
training; [and]
(b) Has completed the courses required for his or her doctoral
training program or doctorate-level training; and
(c) Wishes to engage in a predoctoral internship pursuant to the
requirements of the training program,
 may [register with] submit an application to the Board for a
provisional license as a psychological intern.
3. A person who:
(a) Is in a doctoral training program in psychology at an
accredited educational institution approved by the Board or in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
doctorate-level training from an accredited educational institution
deemed equivalent by the Board in both subject matter and extent of
training; and
(b) Wishes to perform professional activities or services under
the supervision of a psychologist,
 may register with the Board as a psychological trainee.
4. A person desiring to register or obtain a provisional license
as a psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee , as applicable, must:
(a) Make application to the Board on a form, and in a manner,
prescribed by the Board. The application must be accompanied by
the application fee prescribed by the Board and include all
information required to complete the application.
(b) As part of the application and at his or her own expense:
(1) Arrange to have a complete set of fingerprints taken by a
law enforcement agency or other authorized entity acceptable to the
Board; and
(2) Submit to the Board:
(I) A complete set of fingerprints, a fee for the processing
of fingerprints established by the Board and written permission
authorizing the Board to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a report on the applicant’s
background, and to such other law enforcement agencies as the
Board deems necessary for a report on the applicant’s background;
or
(II) Written verification, on a form prescribed by the
Board, stating that the set of fingerprints of the applicant was taken
and directly forwarded electronically or by other means to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History and that
the applicant provided written permission authorizing the law
enforcement agency or other authorized entity taking the
fingerprints to submit the fingerprints to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a report on the applicant’s background,
and to such other law enforcement agencies as the Board deems
necessary for a report on the applicant’s background.
5. The Board may:
(a) Unless the applicant’s fingerprints are directly forwarded
pursuant to sub-subparagraph (II) of subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(b) of subsection 4, submit those fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and to such other law
enforcement agencies as the Board deems necessary; and
(b) Request from each agency to which the Board submits the
fingerprints any information regarding the applicant’s background
as the Board deems necessary.
6. An application for an initial registration as a psychological
trainee or a provisional license as a psychological assistant [,] or
psychological intern [or psychological trainee] is not considered
complete and received until the Board receives:
(a) A complete set of fingerprints or verification that the
fingerprints have been forwarded electronically or by other means to
the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History, and
written authorization from the applicant pursuant to this section; and
(b) The fee for the initial registration of a psychological trainee
or issuance of a provisional license as a psychological assistant [,]
or psychological intern [or psychological trainee] that is prescribed
by the Board pursuant to NRS 641.228.
7. A registration or provisional license as a:
(a) Psychological assistant expires 1 year after the date of
[registration] licensure unless the [registration] provisional license
is renewed pursuant to subsection 8. A [registration] provisional
license as a psychological assistant may not be renewed if the
renewal would cause the psychological assistant to be [registered]
provisionally licensed as a psychological assistant for more than 3
years unless otherwise approved by the Board.
(b) Psychological intern expires 2 years after the date of
[registration and may not be] licensure unless the provisional
license is renewed [unless otherwise approved by the Board.]
pursuant to subsection 8.
(c) Psychological trainee expires 2 years after the date of
registration unless the registration is renewed pursuant to subsection
8. A registration as a psychological trainee may not be renewed if
the renewal would cause the psychological trainee to be registered
as a psychological trainee for more than 5 years unless otherwise
approved by the Board.
8. To renew a registration or provisional license as a
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee, as applicable, the registrant or provisional licensee must,
on or before the expiration of the [registration:] registration or
provisional license:
(a) Apply to the Board for renewal;
(b) Pay the fee prescribed by the Board pursuant to NRS
641.228 for the renewal of a registration or provisional license as a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee [;] , as applicable, and
(c) Submit all information required to complete the renewal.
9. Any activity or service performed by a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or psychological trainee must be
performed under the supervision of a psychologist in accordance
with regulations adopted by the Board.
Sec. 14. NRS 641.228 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.228 1. The Board shall charge and collect not more than
the following fees respectively:
For the national examination, in addition to the
actual cost to the Board of the examination ................ $100
For any other examination required pursuant to
the provisions of subsection 1 of NRS
641.180, in addition to the actual costs to the
Board of the examination .............................................. 100
For the issuance of an initial license ..................................... 25
For the issuance of an initial license by
endorsement .................................................................. 125
For the biennial renewal of a license of a
psychologist ................................................................... 850
For the restoration of a license suspended for the
nonpayment of the biennial fee for the
renewal of a license ....................................................... 200
For the restoration of a license suspended for the
nonsubmission of evidence to the Board of
completion of the requirements for
continuing education as required for the
renewal of the license .................................................... 200
For the registration of a firm, partnership or
corporation which engages in or offers to
engage in the practice of psychology ............................ 300
For the registration of a nonresident to practice
as a consultant ............................................................... 100
For the initial registration of or issuance of a
provisional license as a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee , as applicable ............................ 250
For the renewal of a registration of or
provisional license as a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee , as applicable ............................ 150
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
2. An applicant who passes the national examination and any
other examination required pursuant to the provisions of subsection
1 of NRS 641.180 and who is eligible for a license as a psychologist
shall pay the biennial fee for the renewal of a license, which must be
prorated for the period from the date the license is issued to the end
of the biennium.
3. In addition to the fees set forth in subsection 1, the Board
may charge and collect a fee for the expedited processing of a
request or for any other incidental service it provides. The fee must
not exceed the cost to provide the service.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if an applicant
submits an application for a license by endorsement pursuant to
NRS 641.196, the Board shall charge and collect:
(a) Not more than the fee specified in subsection 1 for the
issuance of an initial license by endorsement; and
(b) The biennial fee for the renewal of a license, which must be
prorated for the period from the date the license is issued to the end
of the biennium.
5. If an active member of, or the spouse of an active member
of, the Armed Forces of the United States, a veteran or the surviving
spouse of a veteran submits an application for a license by
endorsement pursuant to NRS 641.196, the Board shall collect not
more than one-half of the fee set forth in subsection 1 for the initial
issuance of the license by endorsement.
6. If an applicant submits an application for an initial
registration as a psychological trainee or a provisional license as a
psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern [or psychological
trainee] pursuant to NRS 641.226 and the applicant has previously
been registered as a psychological trainee or provisionally licensed
as a psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern , [or
psychological trainee,] the Board must waive the fee set forth in
subsection 1 for the initial [registration.] registration or provisional
license.
7. As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 417.005.
Sec. 15. NRS 641.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.230 1. The Board may suspend or revoke a person’s
license as a psychologist , [or] registration as a psychological
trainee or provisional license as a psychological assistant [,] or
psychological intern , [or psychological trainee,] place the person on
probation, require remediation for the person or take any other
action specified by regulation if the Board finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that the person has:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(a) Been convicted of a felony relating to the practice of
psychology or to practicing as a psychological assistant,
psychological intern or psychological trainee.
(b) Been convicted of any crime or offense that reflects the
inability of the person to practice psychology or to practice as a
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee with due regard for the health and safety of others.
(c) Been convicted of violating any of the provisions of NRS
616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440,
inclusive.
(d) Engaged in gross malpractice or repeated malpractice or
gross negligence in the practice of psychology or the practice as a
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee.
(e) Aided or abetted the practice of psychology or the practice as
a psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee by a person not licensed , [or] registered or provisionally
licensed by the Board.
(f) Made any fraudulent or untrue statement to the Board.
(g) Violated a regulation adopted by the Board.
(h) Had a license to practice psychology [or] , a registration to
practice as a psychological trainee or a provisional license to
practice as a psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern [or
psychological trainee] suspended or revoked or has had any other
disciplinary action taken against the person by another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or a foreign
country, if at least one of the grounds for discipline is the same or
substantially equivalent to any ground contained in this chapter.
(i) Failed to report to the Board within 30 days the revocation,
suspension or surrender of, or any other disciplinary action taken
against, a license or certificate to practice psychology [or] , a
registration as a psychological trainee or a provisional license to
practice as a psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern [or
psychological trainee] issued to the person by another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or a foreign
country.
(j) Violated or attempted to violate, directly or indirectly, or
assisted in or abetted the violation of or conspired to violate a
provision of this chapter.
(k) Performed or attempted to perform any professional service
while impaired by alcohol, drugs or by a mental or physical illness,
disorder or disease.
(l) Engaged in sexual activity with a patient or client.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(m) Been convicted of abuse or fraud in connection with any
state or federal program which provides medical assistance.
(n) Been convicted of submitting a false claim for payment to
the insurer of a patient or client.
(o) Operated a medical facility, as defined in NRS 449.0151, at
any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility was suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurred which resulted in the
suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
2. As used in this section, “preponderance of the evidence” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 233B.0375.
Sec. 16. NRS 641.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.240 1. If the Board, a panel of its members or a hearing
officer appointed by the Board finds a person guilty in a disciplinary
proceeding, it may:
(a) Administer a public reprimand.
(b) Limit the person’s practice.
(c) Suspend the person’s license , [or] registration or provisional
license for a period of not more than 1 year.
(d) Revoke the person’s license , registration or [registration.]
provisional license.
(e) Impose a fine of not more than $5,000.
(f) Revoke or suspend the person’s license , [or] registration or
provisional license and impose a monetary penalty.
(g) Suspend the enforcement of any penalty by placing the
person on probation. The Board may revoke the probation if the
person does not follow any conditions imposed.
(h) Require the person to submit to the supervision of or
counseling or treatment by a person designated by the Board. The
person named in the complaint is responsible for any expense
incurred.
(i) Impose and modify any conditions of probation for the
protection of the public or the rehabilitation of the probationer.
(j) Require the person to pay for the costs of remediation or
restitution.
2. The Board shall not administer a private reprimand.
3. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
Sec. 17. NRS 641.242 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.242 1. If the Board receives a copy of a court order
issued pursuant to NRS 425.540 that provides for the suspension of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
all professional, occupational and recreational licenses, certificates
and permits issued to a person who is the holder of a license , [or]
registration or provisional license issued pursuant to this chapter,
the Board shall deem the license , [or] registration or provisional
license issued to that person to be suspended at the end of the 30th
day after the date on which the court order was issued unless the
Board receives a letter issued to the holder of the license , [or]
registration or provisional license by the district attorney or other
public agency pursuant to NRS 425.550 stating that the holder of the
license , [or] registration or provisional license has complied with
the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage pursuant to
NRS 425.560.
2. The Board shall reinstate a license , [or] registration or
provisional license issued pursuant to this chapter that has been
suspended by a district court pursuant to NRS 425.540 if the Board
receives a letter issued by the district attorney or other public agency
pursuant to NRS 425.550 to the person whose license , [or]
registration or provisional license was suspended stating that the
person whose license , [or] registration or provisional license was
suspended has complied with the subpoena or warrant or has
satisfied the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560.
Sec. 18. NRS 641.2705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.2705 1. The Board, through the President of the Board
and the investigator designated by the Board, shall conduct an
investigation of each complaint filed pursuant to NRS 641.250
which sets forth reason to believe that a person has violated
NRS 641.390.
2. If, after an investigation, the Board determines that a person
has violated NRS 641.390, the Board:
(a) May issue and serve on the person an order to cease and
desist from engaging in any activity prohibited by NRS 641.390
until the person obtains the proper license , [or] registration or
provisional license from the Board;
(b) May issue a citation to the person; and
(c) Unless the Board determines that extenuating circumstances
exist, shall forward to the appropriate law enforcement agency any
substantiated information that has been submitted to the Board
regarding a person who practices or offers to practice:
(1) Psychology in this State without the proper license issued
by the Board pursuant to this chapter; or
(2) As a psychological assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee in this State without the proper registration or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
provisional license issued by the Board , as applicable, pursuant to
this chapter.
3. A citation issued pursuant to subsection 2 must be in writing
and describe with particularity the nature of the violation. The
citation also must inform the person of the provisions of subsection
5. Each violation of NRS 641.390 constitutes a separate offense for
which a separate citation may be issued.
4. For any person who violates the provisions of NRS 641.390,
the Board shall assess an administrative fine of:
(a) For a first violation, $500.
(b) For a second violation, $1,000.
(c) For a third or subsequent violation, $1,500.
5. To appeal a citation issued pursuant to subsection 2, a
person must submit a written request for a hearing to the Board
within 30 days after the date of issuance of the citation.
Sec. 19. NRS 641.272 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.272 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A
of NRS, the Board may require the person named in a complaint to
submit to a mental examination conducted by a panel of three
psychologists designated by the Board or a physical examination
conducted by a physician designated by the Board.
2. Every psychologist licensed under this chapter and every
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee registered or provisionally licensed under this chapter who
accepts the privilege of practicing psychology or practicing as a
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee in this State shall be deemed to have given consent to submit
to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in
writing by the Board. The testimony or reports of the examining
psychologists or physician are privileged communications, except as
to proceedings conducted pursuant to this chapter.
3. Except in extraordinary circumstances, as determined by the
Board, the failure of a psychologist, psychological assistant,
psychological intern or psychological trainee to submit to an
examination as provided in this section constitutes grounds for the
immediate suspension of the psychologist’s license or the
psychological assistant’s, psychological intern’s or psychological
trainee’s [registration.] registration or provisional license, as
applicable.
Sec. 20. NRS 641.274 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.274 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS, if the Board, a panel of its members or a hearing officer issues
an order suspending the license of a psychologist , [or] the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
registration of a psychological trainee or the provisional license of
a psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern [or
psychological trainee] pending proceedings for disciplinary action
and requires the psychologist, psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee to submit to a mental or physical
examination or an examination of his or her competency to practice
psychology or to practice as a psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee, the examination must be conducted
and the results obtained within 60 days after the Board, panel of its
members or hearing officer issues the order.
Sec. 21. NRS 641.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.285 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS, in any disciplinary proceeding before the Board, a panel of its
members or a hearing officer:
1. Proof of actual injury need not be established where the
complaint charges deceptive or unethical professional conduct,
practice of psychology, or practice as a psychological assistant,
psychological intern or psychological trainee harmful to the public.
2. A certified copy of the record of a court or a licensing
agency showing a conviction or the suspension or revocation of a
license to practice psychology [or] , a registration to practice as a
psychological trainee or a provisional license to practice as a
psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern [or psychological
trainee] or an order containing any other disciplinary action entered
by a court in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States is conclusive evidence of its occurrence.
3. The entering of a plea of nolo contendere in a court of
competent jurisdiction shall be deemed a conviction of the offense
charged.
Sec. 22. NRS 641.312 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.312 1. Any person who has been placed on probation or
whose license , [or] registration or provisional license has been
limited, suspended or revoked is entitled to judicial review of the
order.
2. Every order which limits the practice of psychology or the
practice as a psychological assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee or suspends or revokes a license , [or]
registration or provisional license is effective from the date the
Board certifies the order until the date the order is modified or
reversed by a final judgment of the court.
3. The district court shall give a petition for judicial review of
the order priority over other civil matters which are not expressly
given priority by law.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 23. NRS 641.314 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.314 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS:
1. Pending disciplinary proceedings before the Board, a panel
of its members or a hearing officer, the court may, upon application
by the Board or the Attorney General, issue a temporary restraining
order or a preliminary injunction to enjoin any unprofessional
conduct of a psychologist, psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee which is harmful to the public, to
limit the psychologist’s, psychological assistant’s, psychological
intern’s or psychological trainee’s practice or to suspend the license
to practice psychology [or] , the registration to practice as a
psychological trainee or the provisional license to practice as a
psychological assistant [,] or psychological intern , [or
psychological trainee,] without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person, this provision being a preventive as well as a punitive
measure.
2. The disciplinary proceedings before the Board, a panel of its
members or a hearing officer must be instituted and determined as
promptly as the requirements for investigation of the case
reasonably allow.
Sec. 24. NRS 641.316 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.316 1. The Board through its President or Secretary-
Treasurer or the Attorney General may maintain in any court of
competent jurisdiction a suit for an injunction against any person
practicing:
(a) Psychology without a license or authorization to practice
psychology in this State pursuant to the Psychology
Interjurisdictional Compact enacted in NRS 641.227; or
(b) As a psychological assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee without a [registration.] registration or
provisional license, as applicable.
2. Such an injunction:
(a) May be issued without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person, this provision being a preventive as well as a punitive
measure.
(b) Does not relieve any person from criminal prosecution for
practicing without a license , registration or [registration.]
provisional license.
Sec. 25. NRS 641.318 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.318 In addition to any other immunity provided by the
provisions of chapter 622A of NRS, the Board, a review panel of a
hospital, an association of psychologists or any other person who or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
organization which initiates a complaint or assists in any lawful
investigation or proceeding concerning the licensing of a
psychologist , [or] the registering of a psychological trainee or the
provisional licensing of a psychological assistant [,] or
psychological intern [or psychological trainee] or the discipline of a
psychologist, psychological assistant, psychological intern or
psychological trainee for gross malpractice, repeated malpractice,
professional incompetence or unprofessional conduct is immune
from any civil action for that initiation or assistance or any
consequential damages, if the person or organization acted without
malicious intent.
Sec. 26. NRS 641.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.320 1. Any person:
(a) Whose practice of psychology or practice as a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or psychological trainee has been
limited;
(b) Whose license , [or] registration or provisional license has
been revoked; or
(c) Who has been placed on probation,
 by an order of the Board, a panel of its members or a hearing
officer may apply to the Board after 1 year for removal of the
limitation or termination of the probation or may apply to the Board
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 622A of NRS for reinstatement
of the revoked license , registration or [registration.] provisional
license.
2. In hearing the application, the Board:
(a) May require the person to submit to a mental or physical
examination conducted by psychologists or by physicians whom it
designates and submit such other evidence of changed conditions
and of fitness as it considers proper.
(b) Shall determine whether under all the circumstances the time
of the application is reasonable.
(c) May deny the application or modify or rescind its order as it
considers the evidence and the public safety warrants.
Sec. 27. NRS 641.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.440 Any person who:
1. Presents as his or her own the diploma, license, registration ,
provisional license or credentials of another;
2. Gives either false or forged evidence of any kind to the
Board or any member thereof, in connection with an application for
a license , registration or [registration;] provisional license;
3. Practices psychology or practices as a psychological
assistant, psychological intern or psychological trainee under a false
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
or assumed name or falsely personates another psychologist,
psychological assistant, psychological intern or psychological
trainee of a like or different name;
4. Except as provided in NRS 641.0295, 641.390 and
641A.410, represents himself or herself as a psychologist, or uses
any title or description which incorporates the word “psychology,”
“psychological,” “psychologist,” “psychometry,” “psychometrics,”
“psychometrist” or any other term indicating or implying that he or
she is a psychologist, unless he or she has been issued a license;
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 641.390, represents
himself or herself as a psychological assistant, psychological intern
or psychological trainee, or uses any title or description which
incorporates the words “psychological assistant,” “psychological
intern” or “psychological trainee” or any other term indicating or
implying that he or she is a psychological assistant, psychological
intern or psychological trainee, unless he or she has been issued a
[registration;] registration or provisional license;
6. Practices psychology unless he or she has been issued a
license; or
7. Practices as a psychological assistant, psychological intern
or psychological trainee unless he or she has been issued a
[registration,] registration or provisional license, as applicable,
 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 28. NRS 458A.057 is hereby amended to read as follows:
458A.057 1. “Qualified mental health professional” means
any of the following persons:
(a) A person who is certified as a problem gambling counselor
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641C of NRS.
(b) A person who is certified as a problem gambling counselor
intern pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641C of NRS.
(c) A physician who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS.
(d) A nurse who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
632 of NRS and is authorized by the State Board of Nursing to
engage in the practice of counseling problem gamblers.
(e) A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227, or a psychological assistant who is
[registered] provisionally licensed with the Board of Psychological
Examiners pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641 of NRS and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
(f) A clinical professional counselor or clinical professional
counselor intern who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
(g) A marriage and family therapist or marriage and family
therapist intern who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
641A of NRS and is authorized by the Board of Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors to engage in the practice of counseling persons with an
addictive disorder related to gambling.
(h) A person who is licensed as a clinical social worker pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 641B of NRS and is authorized by the
Board of Examiners for Social Workers to engage in the practice of
counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling.
2. As used in this section, “practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 641C.105.
Sec. 29. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 28, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)